Colorado, session 2026A, HB1046.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 22 to title
5 as follows:
ARTICLE 22
Earned-wage Access Services
5-22-101. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS ARTICLE 22 IS THE "EARNED-WAGE
-4- HB26-1046

ACCESS SERVICES ACT".
5-22-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 22, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ADMINISTRATOR" MEANS THE ASSISTANT ATTORNEY GENERAL
OR THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S DESIGNEE EXERCISING THE POWERS AND
PERFORMING THE DUTIES OF THE ADMINISTRATOR PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF
ARTICLE 6 OF THIS TITLE 5.
(2) "CONSUMER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN THE
STATE.
(3) "CONSUMER-DIRECTED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES" MEANS
SERVICES THAT DELIVER CONSUMER ACCESS TO EARNED BUT UNPAID
INCOME THAT IS BASED ON THE CONSUMER'S REPRESENTATIONS AND THE
PROVIDER'S REASONABLE DETERMINATION OF THE CONSUMER'S EARNED
BUT UNPAID INCOME.
(4) "EARNED BUT UNPAID INCOME" MEANS SALARY, WAGES,
COMPENSATION, OR OTHER INCOME THAT HAS NOT BEEN PAID TO A
CONSUMER BY THE CONSUMER'S EMPLOYER AND THAT THE CONSUMER OR
AN EMPLOYER HAS REPRESENTED AND A PROVIDER HAS REASONABLY
DETERMINED HAS BEEN EARNED OR ACCRUED TO THE BENEFIT OF THE
CONSUMER BY THE CONSUMER'S PROVISION OF SERVICES:
(a) TO THE EMPLOYER;
(b) ON BEHALF OF THE EMPLOYER; OR
(c) AS AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR.
(5) "EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES" MEANS
CONSUMER-DIRECTED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES OR EMPLOYER-INTEGRATED
WAGE ACCESS SERVICES.
-5- HB26-1046

(6) (a) "EMPLOYER" MEANS:
(I) A PERSON THAT EMPLOYS A CONSUMER; OR
(II) ANOTHER PERSON THAT IS CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATED TO
PAY A CONSUMER EARNED BUT UNPAID INCOME.
(b) "EMPLOYER" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A CUSTOMER OF THE EMPLOYER; OR
(II) ANOTHER PERSON WHOSE OBLIGATION TO MAKE A PAYMENT
OF SALARY, WAGES, COMPENSATION, OR OTHER INCOME TO A CONSUMER
IS NOT BASED ON THE PROVISION OF SERVICES BY THAT CONSUMER FOR OR
ON BEHALF OF THE PERSON.
(7) "EMPLOYER-INTEGRATED WAGE ACCESS SERVICES" MEANS
SERVICES THAT PROVIDE CONSUMER ACCESS TO EARNED BUT UNPAID
INCOME THAT IS BASED ON EMPLOYMENT, INCOME, OR ATTENDANCE DATA
OBTAINED FROM AN EMPLOYER OR AN EMPLOYER'S PAYROLL SERVICE
PROVIDER.
(8) "LICENSEE" MEANS A PROVIDER LICENSED BY THE
ADMINISTRATOR PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 TO PROVIDE
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES.
(9) "OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS" MEANS PROCEEDS PAID TO A
CONSUMER BY A PROVIDER THAT HAVE NOT YET BEEN REPAID TO THE
PROVIDER.
(10) "PROCEEDS" MEANS A PAYMENT TO A CONSUMER BY A
PROVIDER THAT IS BASED ON EARNED BUT UNPAID INCOME.
(11) (a) "PROVIDER" MEANS A PERSON THAT PROVIDES
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES.
(b) "PROVIDER" DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A SERVICE VENDOR, INCLUDING A PAYROLL SERVICE OR A
-6- HB26-1046

SERVICE THAT VERIFIES AVAILABLE EARNINGS, THAT IS NOT
CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATED TO FUND PROCEEDS DELIVERED AS PART OF
AN EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICE;
(II) AN EMPLOYER THAT OFFERS A PORTION OF SALARY, WAGES, OR
COMPENSATION DIRECTLY TO ITS EMPLOYEES OR INDEPENDENT
CONTRACTORS BEFORE THE NORMALLY SCHEDULED PAY DATE; OR
(III) AN ENTITY THAT OFFERS OR PROVIDES EARNED-WAGE ACCESS
SERVICES AND REPORTS A CONSUMER'S PAYMENT OR NONPAYMENT OF
OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR SERVICE FEES SOLELY ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES TO A CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY
THAT COMPILES AND MAINTAINS FILES ON CONSUMERS ON A NATIONWIDE
BASIS, AS DEFINED IN THE FEDERAL "FAIR CREDIT REPORTING ACT", 15
U.S.C. SEC. 1681a (p).
(12) "SERVICE FEE" MEANS:
(a) A FEE IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER FOR DELIVERY OR EXPEDITED
DELIVERY OF PROCEEDS TO A CONSUMER; OR
(b) A SUBSCRIPTION OR MEMBERSHIP FEE IMPOSED BY A PROVIDER
FOR A BONA FIDE GROUP OF SERVICES THAT INCLUDE EARNED-WAGE
ACCESS SERVICES.
5-22-103. Earned-wage access services - license - application
- renewal - fees - rules.
(1) (a) BEGINNING JANUARY 1, 2027, A PERSON SHALL NOT
PROVIDE EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES OR ACT AS A PROVIDER
WITHOUT A LICENSE ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS ARTICLE 22.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A
PROVIDER THAT AS OF JANUARY 1, 2027, WAS ENGAGED IN THE BUSINESS
-7- HB26-1046

OF PROVIDING EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES IN COLORADO MAY, UNTIL
THE ADMINISTRATOR HAS ISSUED OR DENIED A LICENSE TO THE PROVIDER,
CONTINUE TO ENGAGE IN THE BUSINESS OF OFFERING AND PROVIDING
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES IN COLORADO IF THE PERSON:
(I) HAS SUBMITTED A LICENSE APPLICATION WITHIN SIX MONTHS
AFTER THE ADMINISTRATOR PRESCRIBES THE FORM AND CONTENT OF THE
APPLICATION; AND
(II) IS OTHERWISE IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22.
(2) (a) TO BE ISSUED A LICENSE, AN APPLICANT MUST SUBMIT AN
APPLICATION TO THE ADMINISTRATOR IN A FORM AND MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR.
(b) THE APPLICATION MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME, MAILING ADDRESS, AND PHYSICAL LOCATION OF THE
APPLICANT'S BUSINESS;
(II) A LICENSE APPLICATION FEE SET IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 5-22-111; AND
(III) ANY OTHER INFORMATION AS DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATOR.
(c) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL REVIEW EACH APPLICATION AND
DETERMINE WHETHER THE APPLICANT QUALIFIES FOR A LICENSE.
(3) (a) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL NOT ISSUE A LICENSE TO AN
APPLICANT UNLESS:
(I) THE ADMINISTRATOR, UPON INVESTIGATION, FINDS THAT THE
FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY, CHARACTER, AND FITNESS OF THE APPLICANT
AND OF THE APPLICANT'S MEMBERS, MANAGERS, PARTNERS, OFFICERS,
AND DIRECTORS ARE SUFFICIENT SO THAT THE ADMINISTRATOR BELIEVES
THAT THE APPLICANT WILL OPERATE THE BUSINESS HONESTLY AND FAIRLY
-8- HB26-1046

AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22; AND
(II) THE LICENSE APPLICATION FEE IS PAID.
(b) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE FOR A VIOLATION DESCRIBED IN SECTION 5-22-104.
(4) (a) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR DENIES AN APPLICATION, UPON
WRITTEN REQUEST OF THE APPLICANT, THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL HOLD
A HEARING ON THE QUESTION OF THE APPLICANT'S QUALIFICATIONS FOR A
LICENSE.
(b) IN ORDER FOR A HEARING TO TAKE PLACE PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICANT MUST REQUEST THE
HEARING NOT MORE THAN SIXTY DAYS AFTER THE ADMINISTRATOR HAS
MAILED A WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE APPLICANT STATING THAT THE
APPLICATION HAS BEEN DENIED AND STATING THE SUBSTANTIVE REASONS
FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR'S FINDINGS SUPPORTING THE DENIAL OF THE
APPLICATION.
(5) A LICENSEE SHALL NOT ENGAGE IN THE BUSINESS OF A
PROVIDER UNDER ANY OTHER NAME THAN THAT STATED IN THE LICENSE.
THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY BY RULE ESTABLISH AN ADMINISTRATIVE
PROCESS AND FEE FOR A PROVIDER NAME CHANGE.
(6) A LICENSE IS VALID FOR ONE YEAR. TO RENEW A LICENSE, A
LICENSEE MUST FILE A RENEWAL FORM ANNUALLY IN A FORM AND
MANNER PRESCRIBED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR AND INCLUDE A RENEWAL
FEE ESTABLISHED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 5-22-111 (3). THE FEE
AND RENEWAL FORM IS DUE TO THE ADMINISTRATOR ON OR BEFORE APRIL
15 OF EACH YEAR. IF A LICENSEE FAILS TO PAY THE PRESCRIBED RENEWAL
FEE ON OR BEFORE MAY 1 OF EACH YEAR, THE LICENSEE SHALL PAY A
PENALTY OF FIVE DOLLARS PER DAY PER LICENSE BEGINNING MAY 2 AND
-9- HB26-1046

UNTIL THE DATE THE PAYMENT IS MADE. IF A LICENSEE FAILS TO PAY THE
APPROPRIATE RENEWAL AND PENALTY FEES ON OR BEFORE MAY 15, THE
LICENSEE'S LICENSE AUTOMATICALLY EXPIRES.
5-22-104. License - denial - grounds for discipline.
(1) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY DENY AN APPLICATION FOR A
LICENSE OR TAKE DISCIPLINARY ACTION AGAINST A LICENSEE UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 22 IF:
(a) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE VIOLATED THIS ARTICLE 22 OR A
RULE ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22;
(b) FACTS OR CONDITIONS EXIST THAT WOULD HAVE JUSTIFIED THE
ADMINISTRATOR'S REFUSAL TO GRANT A LICENSE TO THE LICENSEE HAD
THESE FACTS OR CONDITIONS BEEN KNOWN TO EXIST AT THE TIME THE
APPLICATION FOR THE LICENSE WAS MADE;
(c) THE APPLICANT FAILED TO COMPLETE A LICENSE APPLICATION;
(d) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FAILED TO PROVIDE INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR WITHIN A REASONABLE TIME AS
DETERMINED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR;
(e) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FAILED TO PROVIDE OR MAINTAIN
PROOF OF FINANCIAL RESPONSIBILITY;
(f) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE IS INSOLVENT;
(g) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE MADE A FALSE REPRESENTATION
OF A MATERIAL FACT OR OMITTED A MATERIAL FACT IN A DOCUMENT OR
STATEMENT FILED WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR;
(h) THE APPLICANT, THE LICENSEE, OR THE APPLICANT'S OR
LICENSEE'S MEMBERS, MANAGERS, PARTNERS, OFFICERS, OR DIRECTORS
HAVE BEEN CONVICTED OF OR ENTERED A PLEA OF GUILTY OR NOLO
CONTENDERE TO:
-10- HB26-1046

(I) A CRIME SPECIFIED IN PART 4 OF ARTICLE 4 OF TITLE 18 OR IN
PART 1, 2, 3, 5, OR 7 OF ARTICLE 5 OF TITLE 18;
(II) A CRIME INVOLVING FRAUD OR DECEIT; OR
(III) A CRIME OF ANOTHER STATE OR THE UNITED STATES THAT IS
SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR TO A CRIME LISTED IN SUBSECTION (1)(h)(I) OR
(1)(h)(II) OF THIS SECTION;
(i) THE PROVIDER FAILED TO MAKE, MAINTAIN, OR PRODUCE
RECORDS THAT COMPLY WITH SECTION 5-22-105 OR A RULE ADOPTED BY
THE ADMINISTRATOR TO IMPLEMENT SECTION 5-22-105;
(j) THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE HAS BEEN THE SUBJECT OF A
DISCIPLINARY ACTION BY A STATE OR FEDERAL AGENCY;
(k) A FINAL JUDGMENT HAS BEEN ENTERED AGAINST THE
APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FOR VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22 OR A STATE
OR FEDERAL LAW PROHIBITING DECEPTIVE OR UNFAIR TRADE OR BUSINESS
PRACTICES; OR
(l) AFTER THE ADMINISTRATOR COMMENCED AN EXAMINATION OR
INVESTIGATION OF THE PROVIDER, THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE FAILED TO,
IN A TIMELY MANNER AS FIXED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR, TAKE OR PROVIDE
PROOF OF A CORRECTIVE ACTION REQUIRED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR
PURSUANT TO SECTION 5-22-106 (5).
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES THAT THE SUSPENSION OR
REVOCATION OF A LICENSEE'S LICENSE IS WARRANTED, THE
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL MAKE THE DETERMINATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
SECTION 24-4-104.
(3) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR DENIES A LICENSE APPLICATION OR
TAKES DISCIPLINARY ACTION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE OF THE
-11- HB26-1046

DENIAL OR DISCIPLINARY ACTION WITHIN FIFTEEN DAYS AFTER TAKING
THE ACTION AND SHALL MAKE A RECORD OF THE NOTIFICATION. THE
ADMINISTRATOR SHALL NOTIFY THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE BY A MEANS
REASONABLY EXPECTED TO NOTIFY THE AFFECTED APPLICANT OR
LICENSEE OR BY A MEANS ACCEPTABLE TO THE APPLICANT OR LICENSEE.
(4) A LICENSEE MAY RELINQUISH THEIR LICENSE BY NOTIFYING THE
ADMINISTRATOR IN WRITING OF THE RELINQUISHMENT. EXPIRATION OR
RELINQUISHMENT OF A LICENSE DOES NOT AFFECT THE LICENSEE'S
LIABILITY FOR ACTS PREVIOUSLY COMMITTED NOR IMPAIR THE
ADMINISTRATOR'S ABILITY TO ISSUE A FINAL AGENCY ORDER OR IMPOSE
DISCIPLINE AGAINST THE LICENSEE.
(5) A REVOCATION, SUSPENSION, OR RELINQUISHMENT OF A
LICENSE DOES NOT IMPAIR OR AFFECT THE OBLIGATION OF A PREEXISTING
LAWFUL CONTRACT BETWEEN A LICENSEE AND A CONSUMER.
(6) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY REINSTATE A LICENSE, TERMINATE
A SUSPENSION, OR GRANT A NEW LICENSE TO A PERSON WHOSE LICENSE
HAS BEEN REVOKED OR SUSPENDED IF NO FACT OR CONDITION THEN EXISTS
THAT JUSTIFIES A REFUSAL TO REINSTATE THE LICENSE, TERMINATE THE
SUSPENSION, OR GRANT THE NEW LICENSE.
(7) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR FINDS THAT ONE OR MORE OF THE
CONDITIONS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION EXIST, THE
ADMINISTRATOR MAY DO ONE OR MORE OF THE FOLLOWING:
(a) DENY THE APPLICATION FOR LICENSURE;
(b) REVOKE THE LICENSE;
(c) SUSPEND THE LICENSE FOR A PERIOD OF TIME;
(d) ISSUE AN ORDER TO A PROVIDER TO CEASE AND DESIST FROM
SPECIFIC ACTS;
-12- HB26-1046

(e) IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY OF UP TO ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS
FOR EACH VIOLATION;
(f) BAR THE PERSON FROM APPLYING FOR OR HOLDING A LICENSE
FOR A PERIOD OF FIVE YEARS FOLLOWING REVOCATION OF THEIR LICENSE;
(g) ISSUE A LETTER OF ADMONITION; OR
(h) (I) IMPOSE A PENALTY OF TWO HUNDRED DOLLARS PER DAY
FOR:
(A) FAILURE TO MAKE OR RETAIN RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE MADE
OR MAINTAINED UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22; OR
(B) FAILURE TO PRODUCE RECORDS REQUIRED TO BE MADE OR
MAINTAINED UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 WITHIN SEVENTY-TWO HOURS AFTER
AN ADMINISTRATOR'S WRITTEN REQUEST.
(II) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR HAS PROVIDED ADVANCE WRITTEN
NOTICE OF SEVENTY-TWO HOURS OR MORE TO A LICENSEE PRIOR TO
CONDUCTING AN EXAMINATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 5-22-106, THE
CIVIL PENALTY MAY BE IMPOSED WITHOUT ALLOWING ADDITIONAL TIME.
(8) FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (7)(g)
OR (7)(h) OF THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY IMPOSE DISCIPLINE
WITHOUT A HEARING, BUT THE LICENSEE MAY, WITHIN THIRTY DAYS AFTER
THE DATE THE DISCIPLINE IS IMPOSED, FILE A WRITTEN NOTICE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATOR REQUESTING A HEARING. IF THE REQUEST IS TIMELY
MADE, A LETTER OF ADMONITION ISSUED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (7)(g)
OF THIS SECTION IS VACATED AND THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL HOLD A
HEARING WITHIN NINETY DAYS AFTER THE REQUEST. IF, AFTER THE
HEARING, THE ADMINISTRATOR OR AN ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE FINDS
THAT ONE OR MORE OF THE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINE EXIST, ANY OR ALL
OF THE FORMS OF DISCIPLINE LISTED IN THIS SECTION MAY BE IMPOSED.
-13- HB26-1046

5-22-105. Records - annual reports - rules.
(1) (a) A LICENSEE SHALL MAINTAIN RECORDS IN CONFORMITY
WITH THIS SECTION, RULES ADOPTED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR UNDER THIS
SECTION, AND GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES AND
PRACTICES IN A MANNER THAT WILL ENABLE THE ADMINISTRATOR TO
DETERMINE IF THE LICENSEE IS COMPLYING WITH THIS ARTICLE 22.
(b) A LICENSEE MAY KEEP REQUIRED RECORDS IN ANY LOCATION
SO LONG AS THE LICENSEE IS REASONABLY ABLE TO COMPLY WITH THIS
SECTION. A LICENSEE SHALL GIVE THE ADMINISTRATOR FREE AND
REASONABLE ACCESS TO THE RECORDS IN THE LICENSEE'S STORAGE
LOCATION. A LICENSEE NEED NOT PRESERVE RECORDS PERTAINING TO AN
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES TRANSACTION MADE AS PART OF THE
LICENSEE'S BUSINESS FOR MORE THAN ONE YEAR AFTER MAKING THE FINAL
ENTRY RELATED TO THE EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES TRANSACTION.
(2) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 15 OF EACH YEAR, A LICENSEE SHALL FILE
AN ANNUAL REPORT WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR THAT INCLUDES ALL
RELEVANT INFORMATION, INCLUDING INFORMATION REGARDING
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES ACTIVITIES, THAT THIS SUBSECTION (2)
AND THE ADMINISTRATOR REASONABLY REQUIRE CONCERNING THE
BUSINESS AND OPERATIONS CONDUCTED BY THE LICENSEE IN THE STATE
DURING THE PRECEDING CALENDAR YEAR. THE REPORT MUST INCLUDE:
(a) THE GROSS REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO EARNED-WAGE ACCESS
SERVICES;
(b) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF TRANSACTIONS IN WHICH THE LICENSEE
PROVIDED PROCEEDS TO CONSUMERS;
(c) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF CONSUMERS TO WHOM THE LICENSEE
PROVIDED PROCEEDS;
-14- HB26-1046

(d) THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF PROCEEDS THE LICENSEE
PROVIDED TO CONSUMERS; AND
(e) THE TOTAL DOLLAR AMOUNT OF SERVICE FEES THE PROVIDER
RECEIVED FROM CONSUMERS.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL KEEP THE REPORTS FILED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION CONFIDENTIAL AND NOT OPEN THEM TO THE
PUBLIC FOR INSPECTION PURSUANT TO "CORA", PART 2 OF ARTICLE 72 OF
TITLE 24. THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY ANNUALLY PUBLISH AND MAKE
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC AN AGGREGATED AND ANONYMIZED ANALYSIS
OF THE INFORMATION SUBMITTED BY ALL LICENSEES AS REQUIRED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION. THE ANALYSIS MUST NOT INCLUDE
PERSONALLY IDENTIFYING INFORMATION OF A CONSUMER.
(4) A LICENSEE SHALL SUBMIT THE REPORT REQUIRED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION UNDER OATH OR AFFIRMATION AND IN
THE FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR BY RULE.
(5) IF A LICENSEE FAILS TO FILE AN ANNUAL REPORT ON OR BEFORE
APRIL 15, THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY IMPOSE A PENALTY OF FIVE DOLLARS
PER DAY BEGINNING APRIL 16 AND EACH DAY THEREAFTER UNTIL THE
DATE OF THE FILED REPORT. IF A LICENSEE FAILS TO FILE THE REPORT AND
PAY THE PENALTY IMPOSED ON OR BEFORE MAY 1 OF THE SAME YEAR, THE
LICENSEE'S LICENSE AUTOMATICALLY EXPIRES.
5-22-106. Examinations - investigations.
(1) UPON REQUEST OF THE ADMINISTRATOR, A PROVIDER SHALL
GIVE THE ADMINISTRATOR FREE AND REASONABLE ACCESS TO THE
PROVIDER'S RECORDS FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR TO EXAMINE FOR THE
PURPOSE OF INVESTIGATING POSSIBLE VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22 OR
AS A MEANS OF LAWFULLY SECURING INFORMATION RETAINED BY THE
-15- HB26-1046

PROVIDER.
(2) (a) (I) IF A PROVIDER'S RECORDS ARE LOCATED OUTSIDE
COLORADO, THE PROVIDER SHALL, AT THE PROVIDER'S OPTION, EITHER
MAKE THE RECORDS AVAILABLE TO THE ADMINISTRATOR AT A
CONVENIENT LOCATION WITHIN THE STATE OR PAY THE REASONABLE AND
NECESSARY EXPENSES FOR THE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE ADMINISTRATOR'S
REPRESENTATIVE TO EXAMINE THE RECORDS AT THE LOCATION WHERE THE
RECORDS ARE MAINTAINED. THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a)(I) DOES NOT APPLY
IF SUBSECTION (2)(a)(II) OF THIS SECTION APPLIES.
(II) THE PROVIDER SHALL MAKE, AT THE COST OF THE PROVIDER,
THE PROVIDER'S RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR EXAMINATION AT THE
ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE OR AT ANOTHER LOCATION THE ADMINISTRATOR
DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE IF THE ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES THAT:
(A) THE EXAMINATION OF THE RECORDS AT THE LOCATION WHERE
THE RECORDS ARE MAINTAINED ENDANGERS THE SAFETY OF THE
ADMINISTRATOR OR THE ADMINISTRATOR'S REPRESENTATIVE; OR
(B) THERE ARE NOT ADEQUATE FACILITIES AT THE LOCATION
WHERE THE RECORDS ARE MAINTAINED TO CONDUCT THE EXAMINATION.
(b) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY DESIGNATE REPRESENTATIVES,
INCLUDING COMPARABLE OFFICIALS OF THE STATE IN WHICH THE RECORDS
ARE LOCATED, TO INSPECT THE RECORDS ON THE ADMINISTRATOR'S
BEHALF.
(c) IF A PROVIDER'S RECORDS ARE LOCATED INSIDE COLORADO,
THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY REQUIRE A PROVIDER TO MAKE, AT THE COST OF
THE PROVIDER, THE PROVIDER'S RECORDS AVAILABLE FOR EXAMINATION
AT THE ADMINISTRATOR'S OFFICE OR AT ANOTHER LOCATION THE
ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES IS APPROPRIATE IF THE ADMINISTRATOR
-16- HB26-1046

DETERMINES THAT:
(I) THE EXAMINATION OF THE RECORDS AT THE LOCATION WHERE
THE RECORDS ARE MAINTAINED ENDANGERS THE SAFETY OF THE
ADMINISTRATOR OR THE ADMINISTRATOR'S REPRESENTATIVE; OR
(II) THERE ARE NOT ADEQUATE FACILITIES AT THE LOCATION
WHERE THE RECORDS ARE MAINTAINED TO CONDUCT THE EXAMINATION.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY ADMINISTER OATHS OR
AFFIRMATIONS AND, UPON THE ADMINISTRATOR'S OWN MOTION OR UPON
THE REQUEST OF ANY PARTY, MAY SUBPOENA WITNESSES AND COMPEL
THEIR ATTENDANCE, ADDUCE EVIDENCE, AND REQUIRE THE PRODUCTION
OF ANY MATTER THAT IS RELEVANT TO THE INVESTIGATION, INCLUDING
THE EXISTENCE, DESCRIPTION, NATURE, CUSTODY, CONDITION, AND
LOCATION OF ANY BOOKS, DOCUMENTS, OR OTHER TANGIBLE THINGS AND
THE IDENTITY AND LOCATION OF PERSONS HAVING KNOWLEDGE OF
RELEVANT FACTS OR ANY OTHER MATTER REASONABLY CALCULATED TO
LEAD TO THE DISCOVERY OF ADMISSIBLE EVIDENCE.
(4) IF A PROVIDER FAILS TO OBEY A SUBPOENA OR TO GIVE
TESTIMONY WITHOUT LAWFUL EXCUSE, THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY
REQUEST AN ORDER OF COMPLIANCE FROM THE APPROPRIATE DISTRICT
COURT.
(5) AFTER THE ADMINISTRATOR HAS EXAMINED A LICENSEE'S
RECORDS PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL
PROVIDE A REPORT OF THE EXAMINATION TO THE LICENSEE AND MAY
REQUIRE THE LICENSEE TO TAKE CORRECTIVE ACTION. THE LICENSEE
SHALL, WITHIN A TIME AND IN A MANNER DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATOR, TAKE THE CORRECTIVE ACTION REQUIRED IN THE REPORT
AND PROVIDE PROOF THAT THE CORRECTIVE ACTION WAS TAKEN. THE
-17- HB26-1046

CORRECTIVE ACTION REQUIRED MAY INCLUDE REFUNDS OF EXCESS
CHARGES AND CORRECTIONS OF DISCLOSURES REQUIRED BY THIS ARTICLE
22. THE ADMINISTRATOR NEED NOT ALLOW A LICENSEE TO TAKE
CORRECTIVE ACTION PRIOR TO THE ADMINISTRATOR FILING LEGAL OR
ADMINISTRATIVE ACTION FOR A REPEATED OR WILLFUL VIOLATION OF THIS
ARTICLE 22.
(6) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL NOT DISCLOSE THE NAME OR
IDENTITY OF A PERSON WHOSE ACTS OR CONDUCT IS UNDER
INVESTIGATION OR EXAMINATION PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION OR THE
FACTS DISCLOSED IN THE INVESTIGATION OR EXAMINATION, EXCEPT FOR
DISCLOSURES IN ACTIONS OR ENFORCEMENT PROCEEDINGS INITIATED
PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22.
5-22-107. Administrative procedures - applicability.
EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS ARTICLE 22, SECTIONS
24-4-102 TO 24-4-106 GOVERN RULES ADOPTED AND ADMINISTRATIVE
ACTIONS TAKEN BY THE ADMINISTRATOR PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22;
EXCEPT THAT SECTION 24-4-104 (3) DOES NOT APPLY TO THIS ARTICLE 22.
5-22-108. Applicability - exceptions.
(1) THIS ARTICLE 22 APPLIES TO A PERSON THAT ACTS AS A
PROVIDER FOR A CONSUMER, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PROVIDER'S
BUSINESS IS LOCATED INSIDE OR OUTSIDE OF COLORADO.
(2) THIS ARTICLE 22 DOES NOT APPLY TO A FEDERAL DEPARTMENT
OR AGENCY; A STATE OR MUNICIPAL GOVERNMENT; OR A CORPORATION
ORGANIZED UNDER THE GENERAL BANKING, SAVINGS AND LOAN, OR
CREDIT UNION LAWS OF COLORADO, ANOTHER STATE, OR THE UNITED
STATES.
(3) NOTWITHSTANDING THE "UNIFORM CONSUMER CREDIT CODE",
-18- HB26-1046

ARTICLES 1 TO 9 OF THIS TITLE 5:
(a) EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES OFFERED AND PROVIDED BY
A LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22 ARE NOT:
(I) A VIOLATION OF OR NONCOMPLIANT WITH A LAW GOVERNING:
(A) MINIMUM OR OVERTIME WAGES;
(B) DEDUCTIONS FROM PAYROLL, SALARY, WAGES,
COMPENSATION, OR OTHER INCOME; OR
(C) THE PURCHASE OF, SALE OR ASSIGNMENT OF, OR AN ORDER FOR
EARNED BUT UNPAID INCOME;
(II) A LOAN OR OTHER FORM OF CREDIT OR DEBT; OR
(III) MONEY TRANSMISSION;
(b) A LICENSEE OR A PROVIDER THAT IS LAWFULLY OPERATING
UNDER SECTION 5-22-103 (1)(b) PENDING LICENSURE IS NOT A CREDITOR,
DEBT COLLECTOR, COLLECTION AGENCY, LENDER, OR MONEY
TRANSMITTER WHEN PROVIDING EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES; AND
(c) SERVICE FEES PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22 TO
A LICENSEE ARE NOT INTEREST OR FINANCE CHARGES.
(4) (a) EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES OFFERED AND PROVIDED
BY A LICENSEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22 ARE NOT:
(I) A VIOLATION OF OR NONCOMPLIANT WITH A LAW GOVERNING:
(A) DEDUCTIONS FROM PAYROLL, SALARY, WAGES,
COMPENSATION, OR OTHER INCOME; OR
(B) THE PURCHASE OF, SALE OR ASSIGNMENT OF, OR AN ORDER FOR
EARNED BUT UNPAID INCOME;
(II) A LOAN OR OTHER FORM OF CREDIT OR DEBT, NOR SHALL THE
LICENSEE BE CONSIDERED A CREDITOR, DEBT COLLECTOR, OR LENDER WITH
RESPECT TO EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICE; OR
-19- HB26-1046

(III) MONEY TRANSMISSION.
(b) A PERSON LICENSED UNDER THIS ARTICLE 22 OR A PROVIDER
THAT IS LAWFULLY OPERATING UNDER SECTION 5-22-103 (1)(b) PENDING
LICENSURE IS NOT A MONEY TRANSMITTER WHEN PROVIDING
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES.
(c) SERVICE FEES PAID IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22 TO
A LICENSEE ARE NOT INTEREST OR FINANCE CHARGES.
(5) IF THERE IS A CONFLICT BETWEEN THIS ARTICLE 22 AND
ANOTHER PROVISION OF LAW THAT CONCERNS EARNED-WAGE ACCESS
SERVICES, THIS ARTICLE 22 PREVAILS.
5-22-109. Provider duties - residency.
(1) A PROVIDER SHALL:
(a) DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT POLICIES AND PROCEDURES TO
RESPOND TO QUESTIONS RAISED BY CONSUMERS AND ADDRESS
COMPLAINTS FROM CONSUMERS IN AN EXPEDIENT MANNER;
(b) IF THE PROVIDER OFFERS A CONSUMER THE OPTION TO RECEIVE
PROCEEDS FOR A SERVICE FEE, OFFER TO THE CONSUMER AT LEAST ONE
REASONABLE OPTION TO OBTAIN PROCEEDS AT NO COST TO THE CONSUMER
AND CLEARLY EXPLAIN HOW TO ELECT THE NO-COST OPTION;
(c) BEFORE ENTERING INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH A CONSUMER
FOR THE PROVISION OF EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES:
(I) INFORM THE CONSUMER OF THEIR RIGHTS UNDER THE
AGREEMENT; AND
(II) FULLY AND CLEARLY DISCLOSE ALL SERVICE FEES ASSOCIATED
WITH THE EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES;
(d) INFORM THE CONSUMER BEFORE IMPLEMENTING MATERIAL
CHANGES TO THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE EARNED-WAGE ACCESS
-20- HB26-1046

SERVICES AGREEMENT;
(e) ALLOW THE CONSUMER TO CANCEL USE OF THE PROVIDER'S
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES AT ANY TIME WITHOUT INCURRING A
CANCELLATION FEE IMPOSED BY THE PROVIDER;
(f) COMPLY WITH ALL APPLICABLE LOCAL, STATE, AND FEDERAL
PRIVACY AND INFORMATION SECURITY LAWS;
(g) PROVIDE PROCEEDS TO A CONSUMER BY THE MEANS MUTUALLY
AGREED UPON BY THE CONSUMER AND THE PROVIDER; AND
(h) TO BE REPAID, INCLUDING BY MEANS OF ELECTRONIC FUNDS
TRANSFER, FOR OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR PAYMENT OF SERVICE FEES OR
OTHER AMOUNTS OWED IN CONNECTION WITH EARNED-WAGE ACCESS
SERVICES FROM A CONSUMER'S ACCOUNT AT A DEPOSITORY INSTITUTION:
(I) COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL "ELECTRONIC FUND TRANSFER
ACT", 15 U.S.C. SEC. 1693 ET SEQ., AND REGULATIONS ADOPTED
PURSUANT TO THE ACT; AND
(II) REIMBURSE THE CONSUMER FOR THE FULL AMOUNT OF ANY
OVERDRAFT OR INSUFFICIENT FUNDS FEES IMPOSED ON A CONSUMER BY
THE CONSUMER'S DEPOSITORY INSTITUTION THAT WERE CAUSED BY THE
PROVIDER ATTEMPTING TO SEEK PAYMENT OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS,
SERVICE FEES, OR OTHER PAYMENTS IN CONNECTION WITH EARNED-WAGE
ACCESS SERVICES ON A DATE BEFORE THE DATE DISCLOSED TO THE
CONSUMER OR IN AN AMOUNT DIFFERENT FROM THE AMOUNT DISCLOSED
TO THE CONSUMER.
(2) A PROVIDER MAY USE THE MAILING ADDRESS OR STATE OF
RESIDENCE PROVIDED TO THE PROVIDER BY A CONSUMER OR A
CONSUMER'S EMPLOYER TO DETERMINE THE CONSUMER'S STATE OF
RESIDENCE FOR PURPOSES OF THIS ARTICLE 22.
-21- HB26-1046

5-22-110. Prohibited acts.
(1) A PROVIDER SHALL NOT:
(a) SHARE WITH AN EMPLOYER A PORTION OF A SERVICE FEE THAT
WAS RECEIVED FROM OR CHARGED TO A CONSUMER FOR EARNED-WAGE
ACCESS SERVICES;
(b) REQUIRE A CONSUMER'S CREDIT SCORE PROVIDED BY A
CONSUMER REPORTING AGENCY TO DETERMINE THE CONSUMER'S
ELIGIBILITY FOR EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES;
(c) ACCEPT PAYMENT OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR SERVICE
FEES FROM A CONSUMER BY MEANS OF A CREDIT CARD OR CHARGE CARD;
(d) CHARGE A CONSUMER A LATE FEE, A DEFERRAL FEE, INTEREST,
OR ANY OTHER PENALTY OR CHARGE FOR FAILURE TO PAY OUTSTANDING
PROCEEDS OR SERVICE FEES;
(e) REPORT TO A COLLECTION AGENCY OR TO A DEBT COLLECTOR
INFORMATION ABOUT THE CONSUMER REGARDING THE INABILITY OF THE
PROVIDER TO BE REPAID OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR SERVICE FEES;
(f) IMPOSE THE TYPE OF SERVICE FEE DESCRIBED IN SECTION
5-22-102 (12)(a) IN EXCESS OF THE FOLLOWING:
(I) BEGINNING ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS ARTICLE 22
THROUGH JUNE 30, 2027:
(A) FIVE DOLLARS FOR AN ADVANCE OF PROCEEDS EQUAL TO OR
LESS THAN SEVENTY-FIVE DOLLARS; OR
(B) SEVEN DOLLARS AND FIFTY CENTS FOR AN ADVANCE OF
PROCEEDS GREATER THAN SEVENTY-FIVE DOLLARS; OR
(II) ON OR AFTER JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH YEAR THEREAFTER, THE
AMOUNT OF THE SERVICE FEE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(f)(I) OF THIS
SECTION MAY BE INCREASED BY BUT MUST NOT EXCEED AN AMOUNT THAT
-22- HB26-1046

IS GREATER THAN THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE CHANGE IN THE UNITED
STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR'S BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS
CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR
DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR ALL ITEMS PAID FOR BY URBAN
CONSUMERS;
(g) ENTER INTO AN AGREEMENT WITH AN EMPLOYER THAT WOULD
REQUIRE A CONSUMER WHO IS AN EMPLOYEE OF THE EMPLOYER TO USE
EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES AS A NECESSARY CONDITION OF
RECEIVING PAYMENT OF WAGES;
(h) (I) COMPEL OR ATTEMPT TO COMPEL A CONSUMER TO PAY
OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR SERVICE FEES TO THE PROVIDER THROUGH:
(A) A LAWSUIT AGAINST THE CONSUMER;
(B) THE USE OF A THIRD PARTY TO PURSUE COLLECTION FROM THE
CONSUMER ON THE PROVIDER'S BEHALF; OR
(C) THE SALE OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS OR SERVICE FEES TO A
THIRD-PARTY COLLECTOR OR DEBT BUYER FOR COLLECTION FROM THE
CONSUMER.
(II) THE LIMITATIONS IN THIS SUBSECTION (1)(h) DO NOT
PRECLUDE A PROVIDER FROM USING THE METHODS IN SUBSECTION (1)(h)(I)
OF THIS SECTION TO:
(A) COMPEL PAYMENT OF OUTSTANDING PROCEEDS PAID TO OR
SERVICE FEES INCURRED BY A CONSUMER THROUGH FRAUDULENT OR
OTHER UNLAWFUL MEANS; OR
(B) PURSUE AN EMPLOYER FOR BREACH OF ITS CONTRACTUAL
OBLIGATIONS TO THE PROVIDER.
(i) SOLICIT A TIP, GRATUITY, OR DONATION DURING THE PORTION
OF AN EARNED-WAGE ACCESS TRANSACTION THAT BEGINS WHEN A
-23- HB26-1046

CONSUMER REQUESTS PROCEEDS AND ENDS WHEN THE PROVIDER
CONFIRMS THAT A TRANSFER OF PROCEEDS HAS BEEN APPROVED AND
PROVIDES A LISTING OF THE FEES THAT WILL BE CHARGED IN CONNECTION
WITH THAT TRANSFER OF PROCEEDS.
5-22-111. Powers and duties of administrator - fees.
(1) IN ADDITION TO OTHER POWERS GRANTED BY THIS ARTICLE 22,
THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY:
(a) RECEIVE AND ACT ON COMPLAINTS, TAKE ACTION DESIGNED TO
OBTAIN VOLUNTARY COMPLIANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE 22, OR COMMENCE
PROCEEDINGS ON THE ADMINISTRATOR'S INITIATIVE;
(b) COUNSEL PERSONS AND GROUPS ON THEIR RIGHTS AND DUTIES
DESCRIBED IN THIS ARTICLE 22;
(c) ESTABLISH PROGRAMS FOR THE EDUCATION OF CONSUMERS
WITH RESPECT TO EARNED-WAGE ACCESS SERVICES;
(d) MAKE STUDIES APPROPRIATE TO EFFECTUATE THE PURPOSES
AND POLICIES OF THIS ARTICLE 22 AND MAKE THE RESULTS OF A STUDY
AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC IF THE STUDY HAS BEEN AGGREGATED FOR ALL
LICENSEES AND DOES NOT CONTAIN INFORMATION TO IDENTIFY LICENSEES
OR CONSUMERS;
(e) EMPLOY ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGES FROM THE OFFICE OF
ADMINISTRATIVE COURTS IN THE DEPARTMENT OF PERSONNEL TO
CONDUCT HEARINGS ON A MATTER RELATED TO THIS ARTICLE 22; AND
(f) EXCHANGE INFORMATION WITH ANOTHER GOVERNMENTAL
AGENCY OR OFFICIAL THAT HAS REGULATORY AUTHORITY COMPARABLE
TO THAT OF THE ADMINISTRATOR, SUBJECT TO AN APPROPRIATE
CONFIDENTIALITY AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE ADMINISTRATOR AND THE
OTHER AGENCY OR OFFICIAL OR AS OTHERWISE PERMITTED BY LAW. THIS
-24- HB26-1046

SUBSECTION (1)(f) DOES NOT ALLOW THE EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION
WITH PROVIDERS.
(2) A PERSON IS NOT LIABLE PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22 FOR AN
ACT COMMITTED OR OMITTED IN GOOD FAITH IN CONFORMITY WITH A
RULE, ADMINISTRATOR'S INTERPRETATION, OR ADMINISTRATOR'S WRITTEN
RESPONSE TO A PERSON PURSUANT TO A WRITTEN REQUEST ON BEHALF OF
THE IDENTIFIED PERSON.
(3) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL SET THE LICENSE APPLICATION
FEE, RENEWAL FEE, AND PROVIDER NAME-CHANGE FEE IN AN AMOUNT
CALCULATED TO OFFSET THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF
ADMINISTERING THIS ARTICLE 22.
5-22-112. Administrative enforcement - cease and desist -
penalty - rules.
(1) THE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL ENFORCE THIS ARTICLE 22.
(2) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY ADOPT RULES FOR THE
ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT OF THIS ARTICLE 22.
(3) AFTER NOTICE AND A HEARING, THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY
ORDER A PROVIDER OR A PERSON ACTING ON THE PROVIDER'S BEHALF TO
CEASE AND DESIST FROM ENGAGING IN VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22 OR
ANY RULE OR ORDER LAWFULLY MADE PURSUANT TO THIS ARTICLE 22.
THE ORDER ISSUED BY THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY ALSO REQUIRE THE
PROVIDER OR PERSON TO PAY A PENALTY IN AN AMOUNT OF UP TO ONE
THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH VIOLATION OF THE CEASE-AND-DESIST
ORDER.
(4) A RESPONDENT AGGRIEVED BY AN ACTION OR ORDER OF THE
ADMINISTRATOR MAY OBTAIN JUDICIAL REVIEW OF THE ACTION OR ORDER
IN THE COLORADO COURT OF APPEALS. THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY OBTAIN
-25- HB26-1046

AN ORDER OF THE COURT FOR ENFORCEMENT OF THE ADMINISTRATOR'S
ORDER IN THE DISTRICT COURT UNDER SECTION 24-4-106. ALL
PROCEEDINGS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE GOVERNED BY
SECTIONS 24-4-105 AND 24-4-106.
(5) (a) WITH RESPECT TO AN ACTION BROUGHT TO ENJOIN
VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22, THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY APPLY TO THE
COURT OF APPROPRIATE JURISDICTION FOR A TEMPORARY RESTRAINING
ORDER OR A PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION AGAINST A RESPONDENT PENDING
FINAL DETERMINATION OF PROCEEDINGS. IF THE COURT FINDS AFTER A
HEARING THAT THERE IS REASONABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT THE
RESPONDENT IS ENGAGING IN OR IS LIKELY TO ENGAGE IN CONDUCT
SOUGHT TO BE RESTRAINED, THE COURT MAY GRANT A TEMPORARY
RESTRAINING ORDER OR PRELIMINARY INJUNCTION. THE COURT MAY ALSO
ISSUE AN ORDER OR JUDGMENT AS MAY BE NECESSARY TO RESTORE A
CONSUMER WHO HAS BEEN AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION, AN AGREEMENT,
OR CONDUCT TO THE CONSUMER'S ORIGINAL POSITION OR TO COMPENSATE
A CONSUMER IF THERE IS REASONABLE CAUSE TO BELIEVE THAT
SUFFICIENT FUNDING TO MAKE REFUNDS TO THE CONSUMER WILL NOT BE
AVAILABLE AT A FUTURE DATE.
(b) A BOND OR OTHER SECURITY IS NOT REQUIRED OF THE
ADMINISTRATOR BEFORE RELIEF UNDER THIS SUBSECTION (5) MAY BE
GRANTED.
5-22-113. Civil actions by administrator - penalty.
(1) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION AGAINST A
PROVIDER OR A PERSON ACTING ON THE PROVIDER'S BEHALF TO RECOVER
A CIVIL PENALTY FOR WILLFULLY VIOLATING THIS ARTICLE 22 OR FOR
REPEATEDLY AND WILLFULLY VIOLATING THIS ARTICLE 22. IF THE COURT
-26- HB26-1046

FINDS THAT THE DEFENDANT HAS WILLFULLY VIOLATED THIS ARTICLE 22,
THE COURT MAY ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY OF NO MORE THAN FIVE
THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION. IF THE COURT FINDS THAT THE
DEFENDANT HAS ENGAGED IN A COURSE OF REPEATED AND WILLFUL
VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22, THE COURT MAY ASSESS A CIVIL PENALTY
OF NO MORE THAN TEN THOUSAND DOLLARS PER VIOLATION. A COURT
SHALL NOT IMPOSE A CIVIL PENALTY PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (1)
FOR VIOLATIONS OF THIS ARTICLE 22 THAT OCCUR MORE THAN FOUR
YEARS BEFORE THE ACTION IS BROUGHT.
(2) IF THE ADMINISTRATOR PREVAILS IN AN ACTION BROUGHT
UNDER THIS SECTION:
(a) THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY SEEK TO RECOVER REASONABLE
COSTS OF THE INVESTIGATION AND ACTION AND MAY REQUEST AN ORDER
FOR REIMBURSEMENT OF REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES; AND
(b) THE COURT MAY AWARD THE ADMINISTRATOR REASONABLE
COSTS OF INVESTIGATION AND ORDER REIMBURSEMENT OF REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES.
(3) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ADMINISTRATOR UNDER THIS
ARTICLE 22, THE ADMINISTRATOR DOES NOT HAVE A RIGHT TO TRIAL BY
JURY, BUT A DEFENDANT MAY REQUEST, AND A COURT SHALL GRANT UPON
REQUEST, A JURY TRIAL UNDER THE COLORADO RULES OF CIVIL
PROCEDURE.
5-22-114. Assurance of discontinuance.
IF A PERSON FILES A COMPLAINT WITH THE ADMINISTRATOR AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 5-22-111 (1)(a) OR WITH A COURT AS DESCRIBED
IN SECTION 5-22-112 THAT A PROVIDER HAS ENGAGED IN CONDUCT THAT
FAILS TO COMPLY WITH AN ORDER BY THE ADMINISTRATOR OR BY THE
-27- HB26-1046

COURT, THE ADMINISTRATOR OR THE COURT MAY ACCEPT AN ASSURANCE
IN WRITING THAT THE PROVIDER WILL NOT ENGAGE IN THE CONDUCT IN
THE FUTURE. THE ADMINISTRATOR MAY REQUIRE THE PROVIDER AS PART
OF THE ASSURANCE TO PAY UP TO ONE THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH
VIOLATION AND REIMBURSE THE ADMINISTRATOR FOR THE
ADMINISTRATOR'S REASONABLE COSTS INCURRED IN INVESTIGATING THE
CONDUCT.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-4-102, add
(2)(oo) as follows:
13-4-102. Jurisdiction.
(2) The court of appeals has initial jurisdiction to:
(oo) REVIEW FINAL DECISIONS OR ORDERS OF THE ADMINISTRATOR
AS PROVIDED IN ARTICLE 22 OF TITLE 5.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-4-104, amend
(3)(b) as follows:
24-4-104. Licenses - issuance, suspension or revocation,
renewal.
(3) (b) The full investigation requirement specified in subsection
(3)(a) of this section shall not apply to licenses issued under ARTICLE 22
OF TITLE 5; articles 1.1, 9, 10.1, and 11.5 of title 40; or article 2 of title 42.
SECTION 4. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
-28- HB26-1046

will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-29- HB26-1046